Alabama, session 2026rs, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
23 Section 1. Sections 17-14-30 through 17-14-37 of
24 Article 2 of Chapter 14 of Title 17, Code of Alabama 1975, are
25 designated as Division 1 of Article 2.
26 Section 2. Division 2, commencing with Section
27 17-14-40, is added to Article 2 of Chapter 14 of Title 17,
28 Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
Page 1

Code of Alabama 1975, to read as follows:
SB11 INTRODUCED
29 §17-14-40
30 This division may be cited as the Alabama Uniform
31 Faithful Presidential Electors Act.
32 §17-14-41
33 As used in this division, the following words have the
34 following meanings:
35 (1) CAST. Accepted by the Secretary of State in
36 accordance with Section 17-14-46(b).
37 (2) ELECTOR. An individual selected as a presidential
38 elector under Division 1.
39 (3) PRESIDENT. The President of the United States.
40 (4) VICE PRESIDENT. The Vice President of the United
41 States.
42 §17-14-42
43 For each elector position in the state, a political
44 party contesting the position shall submit to the Secretary of
45 State the names of two qualified individuals. One of the
46 individuals shall be designated "elector nominee" and the
47 other "alternate elector nominee." Except as otherwise
48 provided in Sections 17-14-44 through 17-14-47, the state's
49 electors are the winning elector nominees as provided in
50 Section 17-14-31.
51 §17-14-43
52 Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of a
53 political party shall execute the following pledge: "If
54 selected for the position of elector, I agree to serve and to
55 mark my ballots for President and Vice President for the
56 nominees for those offices of the party that nominated me."
Page 2

nominees for those offices of the party that nominated me."
SB11 INTRODUCED
57 Each elector nominee and alternate elector nominee of an
58 unaffiliated presidential candidate shall execute the
59 following pledge: "If selected for the position of elector as
60 a nominee of an unaffiliated presidential candidate, I agree
61 to serve and to mark my ballots for that candidate and for
62 that candidate's vice presidential running mate." The executed
63 pledges must accompany the submission of the corresponding
64 names to the Secretary of State.
65 §17-14-44
66 In submitting the state's certificate of ascertainment
67 as required by 3 U.S.C. § 5, the Governor shall certify the
68 state's electors and affirm in the certificate that:
69 (1) The electors will serve as electors unless a
70 vacancy occurs in the office of elector before the end of the
71 meeting at which elector votes are cast, in which case a
72 substitute elector will fill the vacancy; and
73 (2) If a substitute elector is appointed to fill a
74 vacancy, the Governor will submit an amended certificate of
75 ascertainment stating the names on the final list of the
76 state's electors.
77 §17-14-45
78 (a) The Secretary of State shall preside at the meeting
79 of electors described in Section §17-14-46.
80 (b) The position of an elector not present to vote is
81 considered vacant. The Secretary of State shall appoint an
82 individual as a substitute elector to fill a vacancy as
83 follows:
84 (1) If the alternate elector is present to vote, by
Page 3

(1) If the alternate elector is present to vote, by
SB11 INTRODUCED
85 appointing the alternate elector for the vacant position;
86 (2) If the alternate elector for the vacant position is
87 not present to vote, by appointing an elector chosen by lot
88 from among the alternate electors present to vote who were
89 nominated by the same political party;
90 (3) If the number of alternate electors present to vote
91 is insufficient to fill any vacant position pursuant to
92 subdivisions (1) and (2), by appointing any immediately
93 available individual who is qualified to serve as an elector
94 and chosen through nomination and plurality vote of the
95 remaining electors, including nomination and vote by a single
96 elector if only one remains;
97 (4) If there is a tie between at least two nominees for
98 substitute elector in a vote conducted under subdivision (3),
99 by appointing an elector chosen by lot from among those
100 nominees; or
101 (5) If all elector positions are vacant and cannot be
102 filled pursuant to subdivisions (1) to (4), inclusive, by
103 appointing a single presidential elector, with remaining
104 vacant positions to be filled under subdivision (3) and, if
105 necessary, subdivision (4).
106 (c) To qualify as a substitute elector under subsection
107 (b), an individual who has not executed the pledge required
108 under Section 17-14-43 shall execute the following pledge: "I
109 agree to serve and to mark my ballots for President and Vice
110 President consistent with the pledge of the individual to
111 whose elector position I have succeeded."
112 §17-14-46
Page 4

§17-14-46
SB11 INTRODUCED
113 (a) At the time designated for elector voting and after
114 all vacant positions have been filled under Section 17-14-45,
115 the Secretary of State shall provide each elector with a
116 presidential and vice presidential ballot. The elector shall
117 mark the elector's presidential and vice presidential ballots
118 with the elector's votes for the offices of President and Vice
119 President, respectively, along with the elector's signature
120 and the elector's legibly printed name.
121 (b) Except as otherwise provided by state law, each
122 elector shall present both completed ballots to the Secretary
123 of State, who shall examine the ballots and accept as cast all
124 ballots of electors whose votes are consistent with their
125 pledges executed under Section 17-14-43 or Section
126 17-14-45(c). Except as otherwise provided by state law, the
127 Secretary of State may not accept and may not count either an
128 elector's presidential or vice presidential ballot if the
129 elector has not marked both ballots or has marked a ballot in
130 violation of the elector's pledge.
131 (c) An elector who refuses to present a ballot,
132 presents an unmarked ballot, or presents a ballot marked in
133 violation of the elector's pledge executed under Section
134 17-14-43 or Section 17-14-45(c) vacates the office of elector,
135 creating a vacant position to be filled in accordance with
136 Section 17-14-45.
137 (d) The Secretary of State shall distribute ballots to
138 and collect ballots from a substitute elector and repeat the
139 process under this section of examining ballots, declaring and
140 filling vacant positions as required, and recording
Page 5

filling vacant positions as required, and recording
SB11 INTRODUCED
141 appropriately completed ballots from the substituted electors,
142 until all of the state's electoral votes have been cast and
143 recorded.
144 §17-14-47
145 (a) After the vote of the state's electors is
146 completed, if the final list of electors differs from any list
147 that the Governor previously included on a certificate of
148 ascertainment prepared and transmitted under 3 U.S.C. § 5, the
149 Secretary of State shall immediately prepare an amended
150 certificate of ascertainment and transmit the certificate to
151 the Governor for the Governor's signature.
152 (b) The Governor shall immediately deliver the signed
153 amended certificate of ascertainment to the Secretary of State
154 and a signed duplicate original of the amended certificate of
155 ascertainment to all individuals entitled to receive the
156 state's certificate of ascertainment, indicating that the
157 amended certificate of ascertainment is to be substituted for
158 the certificate of ascertainment previously submitted.
159 (c) The Secretary of State shall prepare a certificate
160 of vote. The electors on the final list shall sign the
161 certificate. The Secretary of State shall process and transmit
162 the signed certificate with the amended certificate of
163 ascertainment pursuant to 3 U.S.C. §§ 9, 10, and 11.
164 §17-14-48
165 In applying and construing this division, consideration
166 shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of law with
167 respect to its subject matter among states that enact the
168 Uniform Faithful Presidential Electors Act.
Page 6

Uniform Faithful Presidential Electors Act.
SB11 INTRODUCED
169 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
170 1, 2026.
Page 7